Utah statutes.
7-22-107.   Examinations.

The department may examine an escrow agent at any time.  The scope and frequency of examinations shall be determined solely in the discretion of the department.  In addition to annual registration fees, each escrow agent shall pay per diem assessments incident to an examination in accordance with Section 7-1-401.

